Louisiana, session 2026, HB971.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2116(B)(8) and 2197.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2116. Facility need review
* * *
B. The following healthcare providers shall be subject to facility need review
to determine the need for a new or additional facility, provider, program, service, or
bed:
* * *
(8) Types one and two rural health clinics.
* * *
§2197.1. Equality in Medicaid reimbursement rates for rural health clinics
A. The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall take all
necessary actions to equalize the Medicaid reimbursement rate between independent
rural health clinics, also known as type one rural health clinics, and provider-based
rural health clinics, also known as type two and three rural health clinics. In fiscal
years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028, the Louisiana Department of Health shall increase
the encounter rate that is in effect in the previous fiscal year for independent rural
health clinics by forty-one dollars and fifty cents. The annual Medicare Economic
Index inflationary adjustment shall be applied to this rate.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 971 ENROLLED
B. The Louisiana Department of Health shall prepare a state plan amendment
or promulgate and adopt rules, as necessary, to implement the provisions of this
Section.
C. The provisions of this Section are subject to the approval of the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid services.
D. The Louisiana Department of Health shall submit a monthly report to the
legislature that provides the number of encounters per month for each individual type
one clinic and the total amount of monthly expenditures for each individual type one
clinic.
Section 2. Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this Act, the
Louisiana Department of Health shall take all necessary actions to implement the provisions
of Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3.(A) The provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall become effective
when an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for
the implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.